Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2502.02
Legislative findings.

The Legislature further finds that: (1) Many state initiatives for improving or reforming the current service delivery systems for children and their families have been identified and are currently underway within Nebraska; (2) there is a need to facilitate coordination and promote communication across these efforts to identify common visions and approaches and to establish linkages across health, social services, family support services, mental health, and education initiatives at the state and community levels; and (3) these initiatives need continued support and nurturing in order to empower communities and families and to provide and promote an integrated service delivery system.

Laws 1993, LB 520, § 3.